Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3072.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 471.6985, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. If deleted text begin $350,000deleted text end new text begin $500,000new text end sales, audited statement. Any city operating a municipal liquor store with total annual sales in excess of deleted text begin $350,000deleted text end new text begin $500,000new text end shall submit to the state auditor audited financial statements for the liquor store that have been attested to by a certified public accountant or the state auditor within 180 days after the close of the fiscal year, except that the state auditor may extend the deadline upon request of a city and a showing of inability to conform. The state auditor may accept this report in lieu of the report required by subdivision 1. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end